Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 2
Department of Labor

Subchapter 1
— General Provisions

Cross References.

Administration of act providing for payment of prevailing hourly wage by employers in public works, § 22-9-301 et seq.

Regulation of elevators, escalators, and dumbwaiters, § 20-24-101 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1937, No. 161, § 26: Mar. 1, 1937. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the present laws relating to labor in this State are not sufficient to meet present conditions; that in order for the State to coordinate its activities concerning labor with Federal Agencies on unemployment and security benefits, it is necessary that a Department of Labor be created with the powers and duties prescribed by this Bill; therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act shall take effect and be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 1473, § 74: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act includes technical corrects to Act 923 of 2003 which establishes the classification and compensation levels of state employees covered by the provisions of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act; that Act 923 of 2003 will become effective on July 1, 2003; and that to avoid confusion this act must also effective on July 1, 2003. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

11-2-101. Purpose.

The purpose of the Division of Labor shall be to foster, promote, and develop the welfare of the wage earners of Arkansas, to improve their working conditions, and to advance their opportunities for profitable employment.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 161, § 2; Pope's Dig., § 8498; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-102; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5279.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor”.

11-2-102. Definitions.

When used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Employer” includes every person, firm, corporation, partnership, stock association, agent, manager, representative, foreman, or other person having control or custody of any employment, place of employment, or of any employee.

However, this subchapter shall not affect any employer engaged exclusively in farming operations, nor shall it affect employers employing fewer than five (5) persons; and

“Safe” or “safety” as applied to any employment or place of employment shall include conditions and methods of sanitation and hygiene reasonably necessary for the protection of the life, health, safety, and welfare of employees or the public.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 161, §§ 1, 9; Pope's Dig., §§ 8497, 8505; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-101, 81-108.

11-2-103. Exception.

This subchapter shall not apply to mines and mining or the mining industry.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 161, § 25; Pope's Dig., § 8521; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-121n.

11-2-104. Penalties.

Any employer or owner who violates or fails or refuses to comply with any provision of this subchapter, any lawful order of the Director of the Division of Labor, or any judgment or decree made by any court in connection with the provisions of this subchapter for which no penalty has been otherwise provided shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Upon conviction, the employer or owner shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100), or shall be imprisoned for a period not exceeding six (6) months, or both fined and imprisoned for each offense.

Each day the violation, omission, failure, or refusal continues shall be deemed a separate offense.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 161, § 21; Pope's Dig., § 8517; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-120; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5280.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a).

11-2-105. Enforcement.

It shall be the duty of the Attorney General and the several prosecuting attorneys, upon request of the Director of the Division of Labor or any of his or her authorized representatives, to prosecute any violation of the law that is the duty of the director to enforce.

The director may, upon his or her own motion, bring all necessary suits and institute such prosecutions as may be necessary to properly enforce this subchapter, and he or she shall not be required to give bond for cost or make appeal bonds.

In lieu of the penalties provided in § 11-2-104, any penalty except imprisonment may be recovered in a civil action in the name of the State of Arkansas.

The civil action shall be entitled to an expeditious hearing and shall receive precedence over all other matters except older matters of the same nature.

Any sums forfeited under the provisions of this section shall be deposited with the Treasurer of State in the same manner as provided by law for other moneys of the state.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 161, §§ 20, 21; Pope's Dig., §§ 8516, 8517; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-119, 81-120; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5281.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a)(1).

11-2-106. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning creation of the Department of Labor, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5282, effective July 1, 2019. The section was derived from Acts 1937, No. 161, §§ 2, 5; Pope's Dig., §§ 8498, 8501; Acts 1941, No. 112, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-102, 81-105.

11-2-107.
Appointment of director.

The Governor shall appoint the Director of the Division of Labor, subject to confirmation by the Senate.

The director shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

The director shall report to the Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing.

The director shall be a person who, on account of his or her previous vocation, employment, or affiliation can be classed as a representative of employees.

All appointments made while the Senate is not in regular session shall be effective ad interim.

The director shall give a bond in the sum of two thousand dollars ($2,000) with sureties to be approved by the Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing, conditioned for the faithful discharge of the duties of his or her office.

The director shall also take the oath of office prescribed by the Constitution.

The director shall provide himself or herself with a suitable seal, which shall be judicially noticed.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 161, §§ 3, 18; Pope's Dig., §§ 8499, 8514; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-103, 81-117; Acts 1989, No. 927, § 1; 2009, No. 727, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 5283.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The operation of subsection (c) of this section was suspended by adoption of a self-insured fidelity bond program for public officers, officials, and employees, effective July 20, 1987, pursuant to § 21-2-701 et seq. The subsection may again become effective upon cessation of coverage under that program. See § 21-2-703.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a); inserted (b)(2); redesignated former (b)(2) as (b)(3); deleted former (b)(3); and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing” for “Governor” in (c).

11-2-108. Director — Powers and duties generally.

In addition to such other duties and powers as may be conferred upon him or her by law, the Director of the Division of Labor shall have the power, jurisdiction, and authority:

To enforce all labor laws in the State of Arkansas, the enforcement of which is not otherwise specifically provided for;

To administer and enforce all laws, rules, and regulations that are the duty of the Division of Labor to administer and enforce;

To direct, except as otherwise provided, make, or cause to be made all necessary inspections to see that all laws and rules made pursuant thereto that the division has the duty, power, and authority to enforce are promptly and effectively carried out; and

To make investigations, collect and compile statistical information, and report upon conditions of labor generally and upon all matters relating to the enforcement and effect of the provisions of this subchapter and of the rules issued under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 161, §§ 2, 7; Pope's Dig., §§ 8498, 8503; Acts 1951, No. 273, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-102, 81-107; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5284.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1937, No. 155, vested power to administer various labor laws in an Industrial Board.

Acts 1943, No. 126, transferred the powers of the Industrial Board under §§ 11-2-102, 11-2-110, 11-2-112—11-2-115, and 11-2-117 to the Commissioner of Labor, now the Director of the Department of Labor.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in the introductory language; substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (2); and substituted “division” for “department” in (3).

11-2-109. Director — Intervention in and arbitration of labor disputes.

In addition to such other duties and powers as may be conferred upon him or her by law, the Director of the Division of Labor shall have the power, jurisdiction, and authority:

To intervene or authorize his or her representative to intervene in any labor dispute in a strictly conciliatory or mediatory capacity whenever he or she is extended a written invitation to do so by either party to the controversy.

However, the Division of Labor may proffer its services to both parties when a work stoppage is threatened and neither party requests intervention;

To do all in his or her power to promote the voluntary arbitration of disputes between employers and employees and to avoid the necessity of resorting to lockouts, boycotts, blacklists, discriminations, and legal proceedings in matters of employment.

In pursuance of his or her duty, whenever both sides to any controversy agree to voluntary arbitration, the director may appoint temporary boards of arbitration, prescribe rules of procedure for the arbitration boards, conduct investigations and hearings, publish reports and advertisements, and do all things convenient and necessary to accomplish the purposes of this subchapter.

Members of the boards of arbitration may receive expense reimbursement in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.

The Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing may designate an employee of the division to act as chief mediator and may detail other employees or persons not in the division from time to time to act as his or her assistants for the purpose of executing these provisions.

Employees of the division shall serve on temporary boards without extra compensation.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 161, § 7; Pope's Dig., § 8503; Acts 1951, No. 273, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-107; Acts 1997, No. 250, § 57; 2019, No. 910, § 5285.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in the introductory language of (a); substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (a)(1)(B); substituted “secretary” for “director” in (c)(1); and substituted “division” for “department” twice in (c)(1) and once in (c)(2).

11-2-110. Director — Rulemaking authority.

In addition to such other powers and duties as may be conferred upon him or her by law, the Director of the Division of Labor shall have the power to make, modify, and repeal reasonable rules for the prevention of accidents or industrial or occupational diseases in every employment or place of employment and to make, modify, and repeal reasonable rules for the construction, repair, and maintenance of places of employment, places of public assembly, and public buildings which shall render them safe.

The director shall have the power to make, modify, or repeal such rules, or changes in rules, as he or she may deem necessary to carry out the provisions of this subchapter.

The director may appoint committees composed of employers, employees, and experts to suggest rules or changes therein.

The rules of the director shall have the force and effect of law and shall be enforced by the director in the same manner as the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 161, § 10; Pope's Dig., § 8506; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-109; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5286.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a).

Cross References.

Injuries, rules to prevent based on information from Workers' Compensation Commission, § 11-9-207.

11-2-111. Office — Employees — Location of hearings.

The Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing is authorized to appoint a deputy director, a secretary, the heads of divisions, and such other employees as may be necessary. He or she is authorized to assign them to their duties and recommend to the General Assembly the salaries that are to be fixed by appropriation.

The Division of Labor shall keep an office in Pulaski County and shall maintain such other office as shall meet the convenience of the division and the public.

The members, employees, and agents of the division shall be entitled to receive from the state their necessary and actual expenses while traveling on the business of the division either within or without the State of Arkansas.

The Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing and his or her authorized representatives may hold hearings at any place other than the Capitol when the convenience of the division and of the interested parties requires.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 161, §§ 4, 5; Pope's Dig., §§ 8500, 8501; Acts 1941, No. 112, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-104, 81-105; Acts 1989, No. 927, § 2; 2013, No. 1151, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 5287.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment deleted the last sentence in (b).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a); substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (b) and substituted “division” for “department” throughout (b), (c), and (d); substituted “Pulaski County” for “the City of Little Rock” in (b); and substituted “secretary” for “director” in (d).

11-2-112. Promulgation of rules.

Before any rule is adopted, amended, or repealed, there shall be a public hearing thereon, notice of which shall be published at least once and not less than ten (10) days prior to the public hearing in such newspaper as the Director of the Division of Labor may prescribe.

All rules and all amendments and repeals thereof shall, unless otherwise prescribed by the director, take effect thirty (30) days after the first publication thereof, and certified copies shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State.

Every rule adopted and every amendment or repeal shall be published in such manner as the director may determine, and the director shall deliver a copy to every person making application therefor. The director shall include the text of each rule or amendment in an appendix to the annual report of the Division of Labor next following the adoption or amendment of the rule.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 161, §§ 11, 12; Pope's Dig., §§ 8507, 8508; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-110, 81-111; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5288.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a); and substituted “Division of Labor” for “department” in the second sentence of (b)(2).

11-2-113. Variation of rule due to difficulties or hardship.

If there shall be practical difficulties or unnecessary hardships in carrying out a rule of the Director of the Division of Labor, the director may, after public hearing, make a variation from such requirement if the spirit of the rule and law shall be observed.

Any person affected by the rule, or his or her agent, may petition the director for a variation, stating the grounds therefor.

The director shall fix a day for a hearing on the petition and give reasonable notice to the petitioner.

A properly indexed record of all variations made shall be kept in the office of the Department of Labor and open to public inspection.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 161, § 13; Pope's Dig., § 8509; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-112; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5289.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a).

11-2-114. Judicial review of rules.

Any person aggrieved by a rule of the Director of the Division of Labor made pursuant to § 11-2-112 may commence an action in the Pulaski County Circuit Court against the Division of Labor, as defendant, to set aside the rule on the ground that it is unlawful or unreasonable.

The action and the pleadings shall be governed by the laws and rules of practice applicable to other civil actions in the court.

Any action brought under this section shall be commenced within thirty (30) days from the effective date of the rule.

All rules of the director shall be prima facie lawful and reasonable and shall not be held invalid because of any technical defect, provided there is substantial compliance with the provisions of this subchapter.

All rules shall be conclusively presumed to be lawful and reasonable if the action is not commenced within thirty (30) days from the date of the rule as provided in this section.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 161, § 19; Pope's Dig., § 8515; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-118; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5290.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment, in (a)(1), substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor”, and substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor”.

11-2-115. Employer records — Inspection.

Every employer or owner shall furnish to the Director of the Division of Labor any information that the director is authorized to require and shall make true and specific answers to all questions, whether submitted orally or in writing, authorized to be put to the employer or owner.

Every employer shall keep a true and accurate record of the name, address, and occupation of each person employed by the employer, of the daily and weekly hours worked by each person, and of the wages paid each pay period to each person.

The records shall be kept on file for at least one (1) year after the date of the record.

No employer shall make or cause to be made any false entries in any record.

The director and any authorized representative of the Division of Labor shall, for the purpose of examination, have access to and the right to copy from any book, account, record, payroll, paper, or documents relating to the employment of workers.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 161, §§ 14, 15; Pope's Dig., §§ 8510, 8511; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-113, 81-114; Acts 2019, No. 910, §§ 5291, 5292.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a)(1); and substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (b).

11-2-116. Entry and inspection of workplace, etc.

The Director of the Division of Labor and his or her authorized representatives shall have the power and authority to enter any place of employment, place of public assembly, or public building for the purpose of collecting facts and statistics relating to the employment of workers and of making inspections for the proper enforcement of all labor laws of the state.

No employer or owner shall refuse to admit the director or his or her authorized representatives to his or her place of employment, public building, or place of public assembly.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 161, § 16; Pope's Dig., § 8512; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-115; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5293.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (a).

11-2-117. Safe place of employment — Duties of employer and director.

Every employer shall furnish employment that is safe for the employees therein and shall furnish and use safety devices and safeguards. The employer shall adopt and use methods and processes reasonably adequate to render such an employment and place of employment safe and shall do every other thing reasonably necessary to protect the life, health, safety, and welfare of the employees.

Every employer and every owner of a place of employment, place of public assembly, or public building, now or hereafter constructed, shall construct, repair, and maintain it so as to render it safe.

If the Director of the Division of Labor or his or her authorized representative finds that any machine, tool, or equipment, or any part thereof, is in a dangerous condition, is not properly guarded, or is dangerously placed, he or she shall attach to the machine, tool, or equipment a notice warning all persons against its use and setting out in complete detail the conditions that render the machine, tool, or equipment unfit for service. The machine, tool, or equipment shall not be used until it is made safe, the required safeguards or safety appliances or devices as set forth in the certificate attached thereto have been fully corrected, and notice of the correction is sent to the Division of Labor by registered mail, accompanied by a certificate from a competent mechanic certifying correction of the defects.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 161, § 9; Pope's Dig., § 8505; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-108; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5294.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment, in (c), substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in the first sentence, and substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in the second sentence.

Cross References.

Inspection of working place, § 11-5-107.

11-2-118. Oaths, certifications, subpoenas, etc. — Enforcement by contempt.

The Director of the Division of Labor and any officer of the Division of Labor designated by the director, in the performance of any duty or the execution of any power prescribed by law, shall have the power to administer oaths, certify to official acts, take and cause to be taken depositions of witnesses, issue subpoenas, and compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, books, accounts, payrolls, documents, records, and testimony.

In case of failure of any person to comply with any subpoena lawfully issued or on the refusal of any witness to produce evidence or to testify to any matter regarding which he or she may be lawfully interrogated, it shall be the duty of any court of competent jurisdiction or the judge thereof, upon application of the director or any officer or agent of the division, to compel obedience by attachment proceedings for contempt, as in the case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued for the court or a refusal to testify therein.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 161, § 17; Pope's Dig., § 8513; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-116; Acts 2003, No. 1473, § 21; 2019, No. 910, § 5295.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment, in (a), substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor”, and substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor”; and substituted “division” for “department” in (b).

11-2-119. False statements made under oath deemed perjury.

Any employer or owner who shall knowingly testify falsely, under oath, or shall knowingly make, give, or produce any false statements or false evidence, under oath, to the Director of the Division of Labor or his or her authorized representatives shall be deemed guilty of perjury.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 161, § 21; Pope's Dig., § 8517; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-120; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5296.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor”.

Cross References.

Perjury, § 5-53-101 et seq.

11-2-120. Annual report.

The Director of the Division of Labor shall annually, on or before January 1, file with the Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing a report covering the activities of the Division of Labor, accompanied by recommendations with reference to such changes in the law, applying to and affecting industrial and labor conditions, as the director may deem advisable.

The report of the director shall be printed and distributed in such manner as the secretary shall authorize.

History.

Acts 1937, No. 161, § 22; Pope's Dig., § 8518; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-121; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5297.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment, in (a), substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor”, substituted “Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing” for “Governor”, and substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor”; and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing” for “Governor” in (b).

11-2-121. Agreements with government agencies.

The Director of the Division of Labor is authorized to enter into agreements with the United States Government and any and all other state governments for assistance and cooperation in enforcing and implementing state and federal laws and projects in fields related to the Division of Labor.

The division may accept payment or reimbursement for its services as provided by the acts of Congress or the legislature of any other state.

All payments or funds received by the division under this section shall be deposited into the State Treasury, to be expended as provided by law.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 414, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-124; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5298.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment, in (a), substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor”, and substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor”; and substituted “division” for “department” in (b)(1) and (b)(2).

11-2-122. Disclosure to employees — Health benefits available.

Any employer or owner who does make available any health benefits to employees, excluding workers' compensation, shall inform and notify the employees of the nature of those benefits as to those benefits being self-insured, fully insured, or Employee Retirement Income Security Act-qualified, and shall provide the necessary information to enable the employees to contact the authority regulating those health benefits.

The notification shall be made at such time and in such manner as prescribed by rules promulgated by the Director of the Division of Labor.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1115, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 753; 2019, No. 910, § 5299.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulation” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Labor” for “Director of the Department of Labor” in (b).

U.S. Code.

The federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act (ERISA) of 1974, referred to in this section, is codified as 29 U.S.C. § 1001 et seq.

11-2-123. Employment training and placement programs for ex-offenders.

In order to help facilitate the restoration of an ex-offender's responsibility and self-sufficiency, the Division of Labor shall work in conjunction with other appropriate state agencies, the private sector, and labor organizations to promulgate rules for implementing placement and training programs for ex-offenders.

Training and placement programs shall be intensive and focus on in-demand vocations and professions, including without limitation:

Professional careers and vocations;

Service careers and vocations;

Information and computer technology;

Medical technology; and

Office administration.

A training program created and administered under this section shall incorporate a “Certificate of Completion” to be awarded to any person who completes a training program under this section, which shall signify that the person is competent to enter the workforce as an employee satisfactorily trained in a particular vocation or profession or as an employee prepared for on-the-job training.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 1151, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 5300.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Labor” for “Department of Labor” in (a).

11-2-124. Social media accounts of current and prospective employees — Definitions.

As used in this section:

“Employee” means an individual who provides services or labor for wages or other remuneration for an employer;

“Employer” means a person or entity engaged in business, an industry, a profession, a trade, or other enterprise in the state or a unit of state or local government, including without limitation an agent, representative, or designee of the employer; and

“Social media account” means a personal account with an electronic medium or service where users may create, share, or view user-generated content, including without limitation:

Videos;

Photographs;

Blogs;

Podcasts;

Messages;

Emails; and

Website profiles or locations.

“Social media account” does not include an account:

Opened by an employee at the request of an employer;

Provided to an employee by an employer such as a company email account or other software program owned or operated exclusively by an employer;

Set up by an employee on behalf of an employer; or

Set up by an employee to impersonate an employer through the use of the employer's name, logos, or trademarks.

“Social media account” includes without limitation an account established with Facebook, Twitter, LinkedIn, Myspace, or Instagram.

An employer shall not require, request, suggest, or cause a current or prospective employee to:

Disclose his or her username and password to the current or prospective employee's social media account; or

Change the privacy settings associated with his or her social media account.

An employer shall not require a current or prospective employee to add another employee, supervisor, or administrator to the list or contacts associated with his or her social media account.

If an employer inadvertently receives an employee's username, password, or other login information to the employee's social media account through the use of an electronic device provided to the employee by the employer or a program that monitors an employer's network, the employer is not liable for having the information but may not use the information to gain access to an employee's social media account.

An employer shall not:

Take action against or threaten to discharge, discipline, or otherwise penalize a current employee for exercising his or her rights under subsection (b) of this section; or

Fail or refuse to hire a prospective employee for exercising his or her rights under subsection (b) of this section.

This section does not prohibit an employer from viewing information about a current or prospective employee that is publicly available on the internet.

Nothing in this section:

Prevents an employer from complying with the requirements of federal, state, or local laws, rules, or regulations or the rules or regulations of self-regulatory organizations; or

Affects an employer's existing rights or obligations to request an employee to disclose his or her username and password for the purpose of accessing a social media account if the employee's social media account activity is reasonably believed to be relevant to a formal investigation or related proceeding by the employer of allegations of an employee's violation of federal, state, or local laws or regulations or of the employer's written policies.

If an employer exercises its rights under subdivision (e)(2)(A) of this section, the employee's username and password shall only be used for the purpose of the formal investigation or a related proceeding.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1480, § 1; 2017, No. 792, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment deleted former (b)(1)(B) and redesignated former (b)(1)(C) as present (b)(1)(B); inserted present (b)(2); and redesignated former (b)(2) as (b)(3).

11-2-125. Relationship between franchisee and franchisor — Definitions.

As used in this section:

“Franchise” means a continuing commercial relationship or arrangement in which the terms of the offer or contract specify or the franchise seller promises or represents, orally or in writing, that:

The franchisee shall obtain the right to operate a business that is identified or associated with the franchisor's trademark, or to offer, sell, or distribute goods, services, or commodities that are identified or associated with the franchisor's trademark;

The franchisor will exert or has authority to exert a significant degree of control over the franchisee's method of operation, or provide significant assistance in the franchisee's method of operation; and

As a condition of obtaining or commencing operation of the franchise, the franchisee makes a required payment or commits to make a required payment to the franchisor or its affiliate;

“Franchisee” means a person that is granted a franchise;

“Franchisor” means a person that grants a franchise and participates in the franchise relationship; and

“Subfranchisor” means a person that functions as a franchisor by engaging in both presale activities and postsale performance.

Notwithstanding a voluntary agreement entered into between the United States Department of Labor and a franchisee, neither a franchisee nor a franchisee's employee shall be deemed to be an employee of the franchisor or subfranchisor.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 966, § 1.

Subchapter 2
— Arkansas Mediation and Conciliation Service Nondisclosure Act

Effective Dates.

Acts 1979, No. 750, § 9: Apr. 6, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found, determined and declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the general welfare of workers and labor and management in this State demands that the Service's mediators and employees maintain a reputation for impartiality and integrity, and that labor and management or other interested parties participating in mediation efforts must have the assurance and confidence that information disclosed to mediators and other employees of the Service will not be divulged voluntarily or because of compulsion. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate guarantee of the general welfare of workers and labor and management in this State shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

11-2-201. Title.

This subchapter may be cited as the “Arkansas Mediation and Conciliation Service Nondisclosure Act”.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 750, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-125.

11-2-202. Policy.

It is declared to be the public policy of the State of Arkansas that the successful effectuation of the mission of the Arkansas Mediation and Conciliation Service requires that its mediators and employees maintain a reputation for impartiality and integrity. Labor and management or other interested parties participating in mediation efforts must have the assurance and confidence that information disclosed to mediators and other employees of the service will not subsequently be divulged, either voluntarily or by compulsion, even after the individual is no longer connected with the service.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 750, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-126.

11-2-203. Definition.

For the purpose of this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the term “person” means one (1) or more individuals, joint ventures, partnerships, associations, corporations, states, municipalities, business trusts, legal representatives, or any organized group of employees.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 750, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-127; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5301.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Definition” for “Definitions” in the section heading; and rewrote the section by deleting the defined terms “director”, “service”, and “state”; and removing the designation (2) from the remaining definition.